District of Columbia statutes.
26-1008

Application fee.

Each application must be accompanied by a non-refundable application fee in the amount of $500, plus $25 for each location in the District of Columbia. The maximum amount of application fees required for all locations shall not exceed $2,500. The application fee shall also constitute the license fee for the applicant’s first year of activities if the license is granted.

History

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 9, 47 DCR 3431